Arkansas, session 2025, HB1393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS NORTHEASTERN COLLEGE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Northeastern College, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas Northeastern College
the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 1 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of a
Precision Machining Facility, in a sum not to exceed .............$2,650,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 1 of Act 80 of 2024, for technology upgrades for
Multi-Modal Course Delivery, in a sum not to exceed ................$850,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 1 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$320,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 1 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$420,000.
*HAR044*
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 1 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$104,270.

SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - BEEBE. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Beebe, to be
payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas State
University - Beebe the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 2 of Act 80 of 2024, for expansion and renovation of
the Bloodworth Nursing Building, in a sum not to exceed ..........$2,329,084.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 2 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of State Hall, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$900,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 2 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Owen
Center, in a sum not to exceed .....................................$770,916.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 2 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$130,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 2 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,130,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 2 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$284,910.

SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MID-SOUTH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Mid-South,
to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas
State University - Mid-South the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for classroom technology
upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$825,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for student laptop upgrades, in a
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
sum not to exceed ..................................................$250,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus security updates, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$150,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for technology infrastructure
upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$150,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$190,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$510,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 3 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$77,160.

SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MOUNTAIN HOME.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Mountain
Home, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the
Arkansas State University - Mountain Home the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for IT infrastructure
upgrades/replacement, in a sum not to exceed .......................$300,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for the renovation and purchase
of an Occupational Technical Center, in a sum not to exceed ........$375,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance
equipment project, in a sum not to exceed ........................$2,625,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for security system upgrades, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$200,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$150,000.
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$280,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 4 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$108,505.

SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - NEWPORT.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University - Newport, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas State
University - Newport the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 5 of Act 80 of 2024, for Phase 2 Photovoltaic Solar
Array, in a sum not to exceed ....................................$3,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 5 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Nursing and
Health Professions Building on the Marked Tree campus, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$500,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 5 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$50,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 5 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$380,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 5 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$219,140.

SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY THREE RIVERS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University Three Rivers,
to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas
State University Three Rivers the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of
Health Science Building expansion, in a sum not to exceed ........$1,431,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
in Item (B) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for Walkway Roof replacement, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$162,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for Classroom Building doors and
windows, in a sum not to exceed .....................................$27,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Ritz
Theatre, in a sum not to exceed ....................................$800,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for Workforce Development
expansion, in a sum not to exceed ................................$1,080,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$220,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 6 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$71,280.

SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY THREE RIVERS -
RITZ THEATRE AND CONFERENCE CENTER PHASE V. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Arkansas State University Three Rivers, to be payable from the Arkansas
Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the Arkansas State
University Three Rivers the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ..................$1,355,611.

SECTION 8. REAPPROPRIATION - BLACK RIVER TECHNICAL COLLEGE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Black River Technical College, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Black River Technical College
the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the RCDC
Building, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$697,500.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
in Item (B) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Welding Lab
in Pocahontas, in a sum not to exceed ............................$1,790,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for AC/Library equipment
replacement, in a sum not to exceed ................................$360,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the "A" and "B"
Buildings, in a sum not to exceed ..................................$247,500.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Health
Science Complex, in a sum not to exceed ............................$405,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$20,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$430,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 8 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$147,205.

SECTION 9. REAPPROPRIATION - COSSATOT COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE
UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Cossatot
Community College of the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Cossatot Community College of the
University of Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 9 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of a
Multi-purpose Facility (Gym/Convocation Center), in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$3,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 9 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$50,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 9 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$320,000.
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 9 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$102,360.

SECTION 10. REAPPROPRIATION - NATIONAL PARK COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the National Park College, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the National Park College the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 11 of Act 80 of 2024, for laboratory equipment, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$300,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 11 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Computer
Resources Building, in a sum not to exceed .......................$3,200,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 11 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$110,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 11 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$500,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 11 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$224,415.

SECTION 11. REAPPROPRIATION - NORTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the North Arkansas College, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the North Arkansas College the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction for
Bradley Center expansion, in a sum not to exceed .................$2,505,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for technology systems
improvements, in a sum not to exceed ...............................$760,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for replacement of sliding glass
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
doors, in a sum not to exceed ......................................$140,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of tiered
classrooms to comply with ADA, in a sum not to exceed ...............$95,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$100,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$500,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 12 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$151,075.

SECTION 12. REAPPROPRIATION - NORTHWEST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Northwest Arkansas Community College, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Northwest
Arkansas Community College the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 13 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of White
Auditorium, in a sum not to exceed .................................$277,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 13 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus security cameras, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$750,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 13 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus audio/visual costs,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$120,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 13 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Plant
Generator, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$90,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 13 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$570,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 13 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$567,770.
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393

SECTION 13. REAPPROPRIATION - OZARKA COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Ozarka College, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, for the Ozarka College the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 14 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the
Administration Building, in a sum not to exceed ....................$500,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 14 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Miller
Building, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$600,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 14 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$270,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 14 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$92,710.

SECTION 14. REAPPROPRIATION - PHILLIPS COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE
UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Phillips
Community College of the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Phillips Community College of the
University of Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for ADA compliance improvements,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$280,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for technology upgrades, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$130,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus security upgrades, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$100,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for roof repair and replacement,
in a sum not to exceed ...........................................$1,020,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Gymnasium,
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$350,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$150,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$970,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 15 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$89,855.

SECTION 15. REAPPROPRIATION - SAU-TECH. There is hereby appropriated,
to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for
the SAU-Tech the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 16 of Act 80 of 2024, for HVAC upgrades, in a sum not
to exceed ........................................................$2,852,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 16 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance/safety,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$648,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 16 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$300,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 16 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,020,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 16 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$112,475.

SECTION 16. REAPPROPRIATION - SAU-TECH - ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING
ACADEMY. There is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the SAU-Tech Environmental Training
Academy the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 17 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
sum not to exceed ...................................................$20,000.

SECTION 17. REAPPROPRIATION - SAU-TECH - FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY. There
is hereby appropriated, to the SAU-Tech, to be payable from the Development
and Enhancement Fund, for the SAU-Tech Fire Training Academy the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 18 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
AFTA Burn Building, in a sum not to exceed .........................$412,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 18 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance/safety,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$162,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 18 of Act 80 of 2024, for training ground
enhancements, in a sum not to exceed .............................$1,261,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 18 of Act 80 of 2024, for technology infrastructure
upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$165,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 18 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$60,000.

SECTION 18. REAPPROPRIATION - SOUTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the South Arkansas College, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the South Arkansas College the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 19 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$60,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 19 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$480,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 19 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$118,350.

SECTION 19. REAPPROPRIATION - SOUTHEAST ARKANSAS COLLEGE. There is
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
hereby appropriated, to the Southeast Arkansas College, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Southeast Arkansas College the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus fire life systems
upgrade, in a sum not to exceed ....................................$783,385.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for installation of emergency
phones on campus, in a sum not to exceed ............................$47,957.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus chilled water systems
upgrade, in a sum not to exceed ....................................$812,977.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus heating water systems
upgrade, in a sum not to exceed ....................................$180,324.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus building automation
systems upgrades, in a sum not to exceed ...........................$995,830.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus video surveillance
and access controls upgrade, in a sum not to exceed ................$679,527.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$90,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$360,000.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 20 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$105,975.

SECTION 20. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE
AT BATESVILLE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas
Community College at Batesville, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas Community College at
Batesville the following:
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 21 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the Main
Classroom Building, in a sum not to exceed .......................$2,500,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 21 of Act 80 of 2024, for land acquisition, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$1,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 21 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$40,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 21 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$190,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 21 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$105,780.

SECTION 21. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE
AT HOPE-TEXARKANA. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of
Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas Community
College at Hope-Texarkana the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
Texarkana Multipurpose Building, in a sum not to exceed ..........$1,503,500.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for parking lot replacement, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$300,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for HVAC replacements, in a sum
not to exceed ......................................................$500,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
Texarkana Classroom Building, in a sum not to exceed ...............$696,500.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for building maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$500,000.
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$20,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$280,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 22 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$96,195.

SECTION 22. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE
AT MORRILTON. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas
Community College at Morrilton, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas Community College at
Morrilton the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 23 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
Allied Health/Health Sciences Building, in a sum not to exceed ...$2,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 23 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation and construction
of East Campus infrastructure, in a sum not to exceed ............$1,500,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 23 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$10,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 23 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$420,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 23 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$191,895.

SECTION 23. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE
AT RICH MOUNTAIN. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of
Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas Community
College at Rich Mountain the following:
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 24 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
Allied Health Services Classroom Building, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,709,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 24 of Act 80 of 2024, for technology upgrade of
Lecture Hall, in a sum not to exceed ...............................$590,500.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 24 of Act 80 of 2024, for the purchase of Allied
Health equipment, in a sum not to exceed ...........................$200,500.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 24 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$50,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 24 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$100,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 24 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$72,675.

SECTION 24. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE
AT RICH MOUNTAIN - HISTORIC AG. AND HOME EC. BUILDINGS PHASE IV. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas Community College at Rich
Mountain, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources
Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas Community College at
Rich Mountain the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$425,128.

SECTION 25. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS EAST ARKANSAS
COMMUNITY COLLEGE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of
Arkansas East Arkansas Community College, to be payable from the Development
and Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas East Arkansas Community
College the following:
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance of
roofs, in a sum not to exceed ......................................$300,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of structural
corrections, in a sum not to exceed .................................$50,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of a
maintenance facility, in a sum not to exceed .......................$240,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for switchgear replacement, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$125,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for renovation of the
Administration Building, in a sum not to exceed ....................$250,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of new
Welding/HVAC Training Labs, in a sum not to exceed .................$750,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for air conditioning for
Vocational Labs, in a sum not to exceed .............................$75,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of
Entrance Closure/Reconfiguration, in a sum not to exceed ...........$600,000.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for demolition of old building,
in a sum not to exceed ..............................................$50,000.
(J) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (J) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$460,000.
(K) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (K) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed ..............$93,085.
(L) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (L) of Section 10 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$150,000.
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393

SECTION 26. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - PULASKI
TECHNICAL COLLEGE. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of
Arkansas - Pulaski Technical College, to be payable from the Development and
Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas - Pulaski Technical College
the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for sealing of windows and
bricks for CCB, IT/BTC and Science/Library Buildings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$350,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for roof replacement/repair for
the Administrative Building, in a sum not to exceed ................$300,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for campus boiler replacements,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$900,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
Center for Excellence and Innovation, in a sum not to exceed .....$1,950,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
STEM Park Project, in a sum not to exceed ........................$1,000,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...................................................$70,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$590,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 27 of Act 80 of 2024, for repair or replacement of
equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed .............$518,610.

SECTION 27. DISBURSEMENT CONTROLS. (A) No contract may be awarded nor
obligations otherwise incurred in relation to the project or projects
described herein in excess of the State Treasury funds actually available
therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that institutions and
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044

HB1393
agencies listed herein shall have the authority to accept and use grants and
donations including Federal funds, and to use its unobligated cash income or
funds, or both available to it, for the purpose of supplementing the State
Treasury funds for financing the entire costs of the project or projects
enumerated herein. Provided further, that the appropriations and funds
otherwise provided by the General Assembly for Maintenance and General
Operations of the agency or institutions receiving appropriation herein shall
not be used for any of the purposes as appropriated in this act.
(B) The restrictions of any applicable provisions of the State
Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the
Revenue Stabilization Law and any other applicable fiscal control laws of
this State and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of any funds provided by this act unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

SECTION 28. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 29. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
02/04/2025 10:17:22 AM HAR044